Utah statutes.
77-13-1.   Kinds of pleas.

(1)  There are five kinds of pleas to an indictment or information:

(a)  not guilty;

(b)  guilty;

(c)  no contest;

(d)  not guilty by reason of insanity; and

(e)  guilty with a mental illness at the time of the offense.

(2)  An alternative plea of not guilty or not guilty by reason of insanity may be entered.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

